Tennessee, session 114, SB0342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-2-201(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(8) Beginning with the election for board of education members held in 2028, all
members of the board of education must be elected at the same election. In order to
align the terms of the members, the members elected in the first election occurring on or
after January 1, 2026, are elected to two-year terms.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0342
001438
- 1 -